Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General
§ 19-3-81.
Power of board to authorize sheriff to operate inmate canteen facilities; inmate canteen fund.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to allow the sheriff of such county to operate a facility or facilities to be known as an inmate canteen facility or facilities, the purpose of which is to make available certain goods and other items of value for purchase by inmates confined in the county jail of such county, employees of the county jail and persons visiting inmates or employees. The sheriff of such county shall promulgate rules and regulations for the operation of such a facility.

If the board of supervisors of any county authorizes the sheriff of such county to operate such a facility or facilities as provided in subsection (1) of this section, any funds which may be derived from the operation of an inmate canteen facility or facilities shall be deposited into a special fund in the county treasury to be designated as the “Inmate Canteen Fund.” Any monies in the special fund may be expended solely by the sheriff of the county for any educational related expenses, to purchase equipment and supplies and to provide for maintenance of the equipment purchased for the benefit and welfare of the inmates incarcerated in the county jail. The term “supplies” shall not include supplies related to the personal hygiene of inmates.

In lieu of the authority to operate an inmate canteen facility under subsection (1) of this section, the board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may authorize the sheriff to contract with a private company for the provision of commissary services to inmates of the county jail. Money collected from or on behalf of an inmate for the purchase of commissary items shall be deposited to the credit of the inmate into a special fund in the county treasury to be designated as the “Inmate Commissary Trust Fund.” Money in the special fund may be expended upon requisition by the sheriff for the purchase and delivery of prepackaged items from the company with which the sheriff has contracted. The sheriff shall adopt rules and regulations for the letting of contracts for commissary services, the collection and distribution of commissary items to inmates, and the items that inmates may purchase through commissary services contracts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 19-3-83.
Authority to adopt ordinances for the regulation of transient vendors.

The board of supervisors of any county shall have the power to adopt reasonable ordinances for the regulation of transient vendors not inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 75-85-1 through 75-85-19. However, such board of supervisors shall not have the power to declare residential solicitations by transient vendors who are citizens of the State of Mississippi, or who are agents of corporations domiciled in the State of Mississippi, or who are agents of foreign corporations qualified to do business in the State of Mississippi, to be a public nuisance or a misdemeanor, unless such transient vendors are not in compliance with Sections 75-85-1 through 75-85-19 or local regulations. Before transacting any business all transient vendors shall furnish to the county wherein such business is to be transacted, a good and sufficient penal bond in an amount not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) conditioned that if such transient vendor shall comply with all of the provisions of the county ordinances relating to transient vendors such obligation shall be void, otherwise, to remain in full force and effect. Any ordinance adopted by the board of supervisors of any county under the provisions of this section shall be applicable throughout the entire county, including any areas within any municipalities in such county, unless there is in effect or is subsequently adopted by the municipality its own ordinance under the provisions of Section 29-19-35, in which case the municipal ordinance shall control as to the area within such municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 522, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 19-3-85.
Authority of board to dispose of lost, stolen, abandoned or misplaced personal property.

The board of supervisors of any county, upon the receipt or recovery of any lost, stolen, abandoned or misplaced personal property by the sheriff or other law enforcement officers of the county, shall cause to be posted, in three (3) public places in the county, notice that such property has been received or recovered. Such notice shall contain an accurate and detailed description of such property and, if the board of supervisors is advised as to who owns the property, a copy of the notice shall be mailed to such person or persons in addition to being posted as required in this section. The owner may recover the property by filing a claim with the board of supervisors and establishing his right to the property. The board may require bond of the person claiming the property before delivering it to him. Parties having adverse claims to the property may proceed according to law.

If no person claims the property within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date the notice is given, the board of supervisors shall cause the property to be sold at public auction to the highest bidder for cash after first posting notice of the sale in three (3) public places in the county at least ten (10) days before the date of the sale. The notice shall contain a detailed and accurate description of the property to be sold and shall be addressed to the unknown owners or other persons interested in the property to be sold. The notice shall also set forth the date, time and place the sale is to be conducted and shall designate the sheriff to make the sale.

However, lost, stolen, abandoned or misplaced motor vehicles and bicycles may be sold in the manner provided in the preceding paragraph after the expiration of ninety (90) days from their receipt or recovery by law enforcement officers of the county.

The sheriff, promptly upon completion of the sale, shall deliver to the chancery clerk a copy of the notice authorizing the sale, a list of the property sold, the amount paid for each item, the person to whom each item was sold, and all monies received from such sale. The clerk then shall deposit the monies into the county treasury and the proceeds of the sale shall be first applied to the necessary costs and expenses of the sale, with the remainder to be credited to the special supplemental budget of the sheriff to be expended by the sheriff for any law enforcement purpose upon approval of the board of supervisors. The chancery clerk shall file the information concerning the sale among the other records of his office. If, within ninety (90) days after the date of the sale, any person claims to be the owner of the property sold, the board, upon satisfactory proof of ownership, shall pay to such person the amount for which the property was sold, and the board may require of such person a bond in such cases as the board deems advisable. No action shall be maintained against the county or any of its officers or employees or the purchaser at the sale for any property sold or the proceeds therefrom after the expiration of ninety (90) days from the date of the sales as authorized in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 502, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.